Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 1
DEFINITIONS AND GENERAL PROVISIONS

31-10-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965".

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1039, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-101 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Clerk" means the clerk of the municipality who is the custodian of the official records of the municipality or any person delegated by the clerk to exercise any of his powers, duties, or functions.

"Election official" means any clerk, election commission, judge of election, or municipal governing body engaged in the performance of election duties as required by this article.

"Electronic voting system" means any ballot card electronic voting system meeting the requirements set forth in section 1-5-615, C.R.S.

(3.5) "Permanent absentee voter" means an eligible elector who applies to receive a ballot by mail for every polling place election and whose name is placed on the list pursuant to section 31-10-1002.

"Pollbook" means the list of voters to whom ballots are delivered or who are permitted to enter a voting machine booth for the purpose of casting their votes at a municipal election. Names shall be entered in the pollbook in the order in which the ballots are delivered at the polls or in the order in which voters are permitted to enter a voting machine booth for the purpose of casting their votes.

"Population" means population as determined by the latest federal census.

"Registration book" means all of the registration records for each general election precinct arranged alphabetically according to surnames and bound together in book form.

"Registration list" means the list of registered electors of each municipal election precinct prepared by the county clerk and recorder from the county registration books in accordance with section 31-10-205.

"Registration record" means the record on which is entered the official registration and identification of an individual elector and a list of the elections at which he has voted since the date of registration.

(8.5) "Residence" means the principal or primary home or place of abode of a person as set forth in section 31-10-201 (3).

"Voter" means a registered elector who has presented himself at a polling place to vote in any regular or special election.

"Voting machine" means any device fulfilling the requirements for voting machines set forth in part 4 of article 7 of title 1, C.R.S., regarding its use, construction, procurement, and trial.

"Watcher" means a registered elector of the municipality whose name has been submitted to the clerk and then certified by the clerk to the appropriate election judges to serve at the polling place with the right to remain inside the polling place from at least fifteen minutes prior to the opening of the polls until after the completion of the count of votes cast at the election and the certification of the count by the judges. Each watcher has the right to maintain a list of voters as the names are announced by the judges and to witness each step in the conduct of the election.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1039, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(8.5) amended, p. 279, § 4, effective June 7.

L. 80:

(3) and (10) amended, p. 414, § 21, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 81:

(2) amended, p. 1498, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(6) and (8) amended, p. 640, § 83, effective May 1.

L. 95:

(3) amended, p. 856, § 97, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(3) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1978, § 107, effective August 5.

L. 2014:

(3.5) added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 59, § 13, effective February 18.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1975. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

31-10-102.5. Acts and elections conducted pursuant to provisions which refer to qualified electors.

Any elections, and any acts relating thereto, carried out under this article, which were conducted prior to July 1, 1987, pursuant to provisions which refer to a qualified elector rather than registered elector and which were valid when conducted, shall be deemed and held to be legal and valid in all respects.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 328, § 82, effective July 1.

31-10-102.7. Applicability of the "Uniform Election Code of 1992".

Any municipality may provide by ordinance or resolution that it will utilize the requirements and procedures of the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S., in lieu of this article, with respect to any election.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire section added, p. 874, § 104, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1707, § 1, effective July 1.

31-10-102.8. Active military or overseas voters - timely mailing, casting, and receipt of ballot - definition.

As used in this section, "ballot materials" means the standardized absentee-voting materials developed pursuant to section 1-8.3-104 (4)(a).

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), the clerk shall mail a ballot and ballot materials to any person designated as an active military or overseas voter in the computerized statewide voter registration list no later than forty-five days before an election conducted in accordance with this article; except that, if the clerk receives a certificate of new registration, notification of change of address, or notification of other change in status from an active military or overseas voter after the forty-fifth day before the election, the clerk shall mail a ballot and ballot materials to the voter as soon as practicable.

In a recall election conducted in accordance with part 5 of article 4 of this title, the clerk shall mail a ballot and ballot materials to any person designated as an active military or overseas voter in the computerized statewide voter registration list as soon as practicable after ballot certification.

To be valid, an active military or overseas voter must submit the ballot via postal mail and complete the signed affirmation, as specified in section 1-8.3-114, not later than 7 p.m. mountain time on the date of the election. Such affirmation shall state the following:

(3.5) The vote of any active military or overseas voter who votes as authorized by this section may be challenged in the manner specified in section 31-10-1008.

The designated election official must count a valid ballot received in accordance with subsection (3) of this section if the ballot is received by the close of business on the eighth day after the election.

No later than sixty days before the election, the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the municipality is located must forward to the municipal clerk a complete list of voters in the municipality who are marked as active military or overseas voters in the computerized statewide voter registration list.

Any eligible elector who is designated as an active military or overseas voter in the computerized statewide voter registration list may use a federal write-in absentee ballot to vote for all offices and ballot measures in any election conducted under this article or article 4 of this title. Such ballots shall be processed in accordance with subsections (3) and (4) of this section.

I swear or affirm, under penalty of perjury, that: The information on this form is true, accurate, and complete to the best of my knowledge; I understand that a material misstatement of fact in completion of this document may constitute grounds for conviction of perjury; I am a United States citizen, at least 18 years of age (or will be by the day of election), eligible to vote in the requested jurisdiction; I am not incarcerated due to a felony conviction; I am not registering, requesting a ballot, or voting in any jurisdiction in the United States, except the jurisdiction cited in this voting form; In voting, I have marked and sealed this ballot in private and have not allowed any person to observe the marking of this ballot, except those authorized to assist voters under state law.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (HB 15-1130), ch. 230, p. 855, § 6, effective August 5.

L. 2020:

(1) and (3) amended and (3.5) added, (HB 20-1156), ch. 51, p. 176, § 1, effective September 14.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 15-1130, see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 2015.

31-10-103. Computation of time.

Calendar days shall be used in all computations of time made under this article 10. In computing time for any act to be done before any municipal election, the first day shall be included, and the last, or election, day shall be excluded. Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays shall be included, but, if the time for any act to be done or the last day of any period is a Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday, the period is extended to include the next day which is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday. If the time for ending the circulation of and filing nomination petitions provided by section 31-10-302, the time for withdrawing from nomination provided by section 31-10-303 (1), or the time for filing amended or new petitions to remedy objections as provided by section 31-10-305 falls on Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday, such act shall be done upon the preceding day which is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1039, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1175, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1769, § 64, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-107), ch. 104, p. 788, § 2, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-104 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

(1) For computation of time under the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", see § 1-1-106; for computation of time under the statutes generally, see § 2-4-108.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 18-107, see section 1 of chapter 104, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

31-10-104. Powers of clerk and deputy.

Except where otherwise provided in this article, the clerk shall render all interpretations and shall make all initial decisions as to controversies or other matters arising in the operation of this article.

All powers and authority granted to the clerk by this article may be exercised by a deputy clerk in the absence of the clerk or in the event the clerk for any reason is unable to perform his duties.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1040, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-105 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-105. Election commission.

The election commission in municipalities having such commission has all the powers and jurisdiction and shall perform all the duties provided by this article with respect to clerks and governing bodies, but the election commission does not have the authority to call a special election.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1040, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-106 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-106. Copies of election laws and manual provided.

At least sixty days before any regular election, the secretary of state shall provide each municipal clerk a copy of the municipal election laws of the state.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1040, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, pp. 1707, 1438, §§ 2, 132, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 856, § 98, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-107 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-107. Forms prescribed. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1040, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1769, § 65, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Before its repeal, this section was similar to former § 31-10-108 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-108. Special elections.

Special elections shall be held on any Tuesday designated by ordinance or resolution of the governing body. No special election shall be held within the ninety days preceding a regular election. No special election shall be called within sixty days before the date thereof, nor shall any special election be held within the thirty-two days before or after the date of a primary, general, or congressional vacancy election. A special election may be held at the same time and place as a primary, congressional vacancy, or general election as a coordinated election pursuant to section 1-7-116, C.R.S., or may be conducted at the same time as a mail ballot election pursuant to article 7.5 of title 1, C.R.S. Special elections shall be conducted as nearly as practicable in the same manner as regular elections.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1040, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 296, § 18, effective June 19.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 856, § 99, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 796, § 15, effective August 2.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 774, § 58, effective June 1.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (HB 15-1130), ch. 230, p. 856, § 7, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-109 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 15-1130, see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 2015.

31-10-109. Submission of question on regular election date for municipalities.

Pursuant to section 31-11-111 (2), the governing body of each municipality, in consultation with the clerk and recorder of the county in which the municipality is located, may submit to a vote of the registered electors of the municipality for placement on the ballot the question of whether the regular election date of such municipality shall be changed to either the Tuesday succeeding the first Monday of November in each odd-numbered year or the Tuesday succeeding the first Monday of November in each even-numbered year.

Where a majority of the registered electors voting on the question submitted in accordance with the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) approve a change in the regular election date of the municipality, the governing body of the municipality shall by ordinance establish its new regular election date in accordance with the vote of the registered electors and may include in the ordinance any alteration in the terms of office of officials that may be necessary to accomplish the change in election dates in an orderly manner. In no event shall the ordinance shorten the term of any elected official in office at the time of its adoption.

Procedures for submitting the question described in paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section to the registered electors of the municipality shall follow the procedures set forth in article 11 of this title pertaining to municipal initiatives.

Any municipality that has changed its regular election date in accordance with the requirements of this section may change its regular election date pursuant to the procedures specified in subsection (1) of this section for the sole purpose of making the regular election date of the municipality the regular election date in effect prior to the change in such date commenced under this section.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 809, § 4, effective July 1.